hangul.lexc
Multichar_Symbols

%>

LEXICON Root

Syll ; 
Punctuation ;
Numeral ;

LEXICON Loop 

Syll ; 
Numeral ;
# ; 

LEXICON Numeral
0:0 Loop  ;
1:1 Loop  ;
2:2 Loop  ;
3:3 Loop  ;
4:4 Loop  ;
5:5 Loop  ;
6:6 Loop  ;
7:7 Loop  ;
8:8 Loop  ;
9:9 Loop  ;

LEXICON Punctuation
%.:%. # ;
%,:%, # ;
%-:%- # ;
%?:%? # ;
%!:%! # ;
%:% # ;

LEXICON Syll
ㅜ:ㅜ Loop "weight:0.8" ;
ㄱㅏㄾ:갍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㄱㅐㅂ:갭 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㄱㅑㅇ:걍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㄱㅒㅌ:걭 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㄱㅔㄱ:겍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㄱㅕㄵ:겭 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㄱㅖㄺ:곍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㄱㅗㄾ:곭 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㄱㅘㅂ:괍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㄱㅙㅇ:괭 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㄱㅚㅌ:굍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㄱㅜㄱ:국 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㄱㅝㄵ:궍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㄱㅞㄺ:궭 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㄱㅟㄾ:귍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㄱㅠㅂ:귭 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㄱㅡㅇ:긍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㄱㅢㅌ:긭 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㄲㅏㄱ:깍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㄲㅐㄵ:깭 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㄲㅑㄺ:꺍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㄲㅒㄾ:꺭 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㄲㅓㅂ:껍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㄲㅔㅇ:껭 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㄲㅕㅌ:꼍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㄲㅗㄱ:꼭 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㄲㅘㄵ:꽍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㄲㅙㄺ:꽭 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㄲㅚㄾ:꾍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㄲㅛㅂ:꾭 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㄲㅜㅇ:꿍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㄲㅝㅌ:꿭 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㄲㅟㄱ:뀍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㄲㅠㄵ:뀭 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㄲㅡㄺ:끍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㄲㅢㄾ:끭 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㄲㅣㅂ:낍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㄴㅏㅇ:낭 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㄴㅐㅌ:냍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㄴㅒㄱ:냭 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㄴㅓㄵ:넍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㄴㅔㄺ:넭 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㄴㅕㄾ:녍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㄴㅖㅂ:녭 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㄴㅗㅇ:농 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㄴㅘㅌ:놭 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㄴㅚㄱ:뇍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㄴㅛㄵ:뇭 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㄴㅜㄺ:눍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㄴㅝㄾ:눭 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㄴㅞㅂ:뉍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㄴㅟㅇ:뉭 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㄴㅠㅌ:늍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㄴㅢㄱ:늭 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㄴㅣㄵ:닍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㄷㅏㄺ:닭 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㄷㅐㄾ:댍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㄷㅑㅂ:댭 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㄷㅒㅇ:덍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㄷㅓㅌ:덭 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㄷㅕㄱ:뎍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㄷㅖㄵ:뎭 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㄷㅗㄺ:돍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㄷㅘㄾ:돭 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㄷㅙㅂ:됍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㄷㅚㅇ:됭 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㄷㅛㅌ:둍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㄷㅝㄱ:둭 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㄷㅞㄵ:뒍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㄷㅟㄺ:뒭 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㄷㅠㄾ:듍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㄷㅡㅂ:듭 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㄷㅢㅇ:딍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㄷㅣㅌ:딭 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㄸㅐㄱ:땍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㄸㅑㄵ:땭 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㄸㅒㄺ:떍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㄸㅓㄾ:떭 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㄸㅔㅂ:뗍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㄸㅕㅇ:뗭 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㄸㅖㅌ:똍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㄸㅘㄱ:똭 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㄸㅙㄵ:뙍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㄸㅚㄺ:뙭 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㄸㅛㄾ:뚍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㄸㅜㅂ:뚭 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㄸㅝㅇ:뛍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㄸㅞㅌ:뛭 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㄸㅠㄱ:뜍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㄸㅡㄵ:뜭 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㄸㅢㄺ:띍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㄸㅣㄾ:띭 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㄹㅏㅂ:랍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㄹㅐㅇ:랭 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㄹㅑㅌ:럍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㄹㅓㄱ:럭 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㄹㅔㄵ:렍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㄹㅕㄺ:렭 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㄹㅖㄾ:롍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㄹㅗㅂ:롭 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㄹㅘㅇ:뢍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㄹㅙㅌ:뢭 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㄹㅛㄱ:룍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㄹㅜㄵ:룭 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㄹㅝㄺ:뤍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㄹㅞㄾ:뤭 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㄹㅟㅂ:륍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㄹㅠㅇ:륭 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㄹㅡㅌ:릍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㄹㅣㄱ:릭 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅁㅏㄵ:맍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅁㅐㄺ:맭 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅁㅑㄾ:먍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅁㅒㅂ:먭 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅁㅓㅇ:멍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅁㅔㅌ:멭 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅁㅖㄱ:몍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅁㅗㄵ:몭 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅁㅘㄺ:뫍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅁㅙㄾ:뫭 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅁㅚㅂ:묍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅁㅛㅇ:묭 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅁㅜㅌ:뭍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅁㅞㄱ:뭭 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅁㅟㄵ:뮍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅁㅠㄺ:뮭 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅁㅡㄾ:믍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅁㅢㅂ:믭 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅁㅣㅇ:밍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅂㅏㅌ:밭 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅂㅑㄱ:뱍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅂㅒㄵ:뱭 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅂㅓㄺ:벍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅂㅔㄾ:벭 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅂㅕㅂ:볍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅂㅖㅇ:볭 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅂㅗㅌ:봍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅂㅙㄱ:봭 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅂㅚㄵ:뵍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅂㅛㄺ:뵭 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅂㅜㄾ:붍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅂㅝㅂ:붭 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅂㅞㅇ:뷍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅂㅟㅌ:뷭 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅂㅡㄱ:븍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅂㅢㄵ:븭 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅂㅣㄺ:빍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅃㅏㄾ:빭 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅃㅐㅂ:뺍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅃㅑㅇ:뺭 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅃㅒㅌ:뻍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅃㅔㄱ:뻭 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅃㅕㄵ:뼍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅃㅖㄺ:뼭 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅃㅗㄾ:뽍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅃㅘㅂ:뽭 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅃㅙㅇ:뾍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅃㅚㅌ:뾭 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅃㅜㄱ:뿍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅃㅝㄵ:뿭 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅃㅞㄺ:쀍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅃㅟㄾ:쀭 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅃㅠㅂ:쁍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅃㅡㅇ:쁭 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅃㅢㅌ:삍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅅㅏㄱ:삭 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅅㅐㄵ:샍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅅㅑㄺ:샭 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅅㅒㄾ:섍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅅㅓㅂ:섭 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅅㅔㅇ:셍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅅㅕㅌ:셭 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅅㅗㄱ:속 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅅㅘㄵ:솭 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅅㅙㄺ:쇍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅅㅚㄾ:쇭 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅅㅛㅂ:숍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅅㅜㅇ:숭 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅅㅝㅌ:쉍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅅㅟㄱ:쉭 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅅㅠㄵ:슍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅅㅡㄺ:슭 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅅㅢㄾ:싍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅅㅣㅂ:십 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅆㅏㅇ:쌍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅆㅐㅌ:쌭 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅆㅒㄱ:썍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅆㅓㄵ:썭 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅆㅔㄺ:쎍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅆㅕㄾ:쎭 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅆㅖㅂ:쏍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅆㅗㅇ:쏭 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅆㅘㅌ:쐍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅆㅚㄱ:쐭 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅆㅛㄵ:쑍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅆㅜㄺ:쑭 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅆㅝㄾ:쒍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅆㅞㅂ:쒭 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅆㅟㅇ:쓍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅆㅠㅌ:쓭 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅆㅢㄱ:씍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅆㅣㄵ:씭 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅇㅏㄺ:앍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅇㅐㄾ:앭 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅇㅑㅂ:얍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅇㅒㅇ:얭 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅇㅓㅌ:엍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅇㅕㄱ:역 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅇㅖㄵ:옍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅇㅗㄺ:옭 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅇㅘㄾ:왍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅇㅙㅂ:왭 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅇㅚㅇ:욍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅇㅛㅌ:욭 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅇㅝㄱ:웍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅇㅞㄵ:웭 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅇㅟㄺ:윍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅇㅠㄾ:윭 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅇㅡㅂ:읍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅇㅢㅇ:읭 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅇㅣㅌ:잍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅈㅐㄱ:잭 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅈㅑㄵ:쟍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅈㅒㄺ:쟭 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅈㅓㄾ:젍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅈㅔㅂ:젭 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅈㅕㅇ:졍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅈㅖㅌ:졭 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅈㅘㄱ:좍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅈㅙㄵ:좭 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅈㅚㄺ:죍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅈㅛㄾ:죭 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅈㅜㅂ:줍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅈㅝㅇ:줭 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅈㅞㅌ:쥍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅈㅠㄱ:쥭 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅈㅡㄵ:즍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅈㅢㄺ:즭 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅈㅣㄾ:짍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅉㅏㅂ:짭 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅉㅐㅇ:쨍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅉㅑㅌ:쨭 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅉㅓㄱ:쩍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅉㅔㄵ:쩭 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅉㅕㄺ:쪍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅉㅖㄾ:쪭 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅉㅗㅂ:쫍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅉㅘㅇ:쫭 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅉㅙㅌ:쬍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅉㅛㄱ:쬭 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅉㅜㄵ:쭍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅉㅝㄺ:쭭 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅉㅞㄾ:쮍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅉㅟㅂ:쮭 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅉㅠㅇ:쯍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅉㅡㅌ:쯭 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅉㅣㄱ:찍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅊㅏㄵ:찭 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅊㅐㄺ:챍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅊㅑㄾ:챭 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅊㅒㅂ:첍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅊㅓㅇ:청 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅊㅔㅌ:쳍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅊㅗㄵ:촍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅊㅙㄾ:쵍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅊㅛㅇ:춍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅊㅞㄱ:췍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅊㅠㄺ:츍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅊㅢㅂ:칍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅋㅏㅌ:캍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅋㅒㄵ:컍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅋㅔㄾ:켍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅋㅖㅇ:콍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅋㅙㄱ:쾍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅋㅛㄺ:쿍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅋㅝㅂ:퀍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅋㅟㅌ:큍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅋㅢㄵ:킍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅌㅏㄾ:탍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅌㅑㅇ:턍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅌㅔㄱ:텍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅌㅖㄺ:톍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅌㅘㅂ:퇍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅌㅚㅌ:툍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅌㅝㄵ:퉍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅌㅟㄾ:튍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅌㅡㅇ:틍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅍㅏㄱ:팍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅍㅑㄺ:퍍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅍㅓㅂ:펍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅍㅕㅌ:폍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅍㅘㄵ:퐍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅍㅚㄾ:푍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅍㅜㅇ:풍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅍㅟㄱ:퓍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅍㅡㄺ:픍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅍㅣㅂ:핍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅎㅐㅌ:햍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅎㅓㄵ:헍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅎㅕㄾ:혍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅎㅗㅇ:홍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅎㅚㄱ:획 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅎㅜㄺ:훍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅎㅞㅂ:휍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅎㅠㅌ:흍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
ㅎㅣㄵ:힍 Loop "weight:2.1" ;
